District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.24

Applicability; construction.

(a)

This chapter shall:

(1)

Apply to all persons engaged in the business of title insurance in the District; and

(2)

Supplement the provisions of Chapter 25 of this title [§ 31-2501.01 et seq.].

(b)

This chapter shall not:

(1)

Except as otherwise provided, limit the application of any acts relating to insurance which are codified in this title; or

(2)

Limit or restrict the rights of policyholders, claimants, and creditors.

(c)

If there is a conflict between a provision of this chapter and any provision in an act relating to insurance which is codified in this title, Chapter 25 of this title [§ 31-2501.01 et seq.], this chapter shall apply.

(d)

This chapter shall apply as of January 1, 2011 and to all transactions entered into after January 1, 2011.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2165, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2165 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).